Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 9 Establishment and Extension of Gambling Activities and Other Facilities

41-9-1.
“Gambling” and “gambling facilities” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “gambling” shall include, but not be limited to, horseracing, dog racing, and jai alai; however, casino gaming shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 9.1 of this title [repealed], and chapters 61, 61.2, and 61.3 of title 42. The term “gambling facility” as used in this chapter means a building or enclosure in which any gambling activity including, but not limited to, the foregoing is played or conducted.

The term “gambling facility” shall also include any building, enclosure, or other improvement designed, constructed, or used in connection with an overall plan or project involving the establishment of any gambling activity; provided, however, that this sentence shall not apply to any gambling facility licensed prior to July 3, 1998.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 594, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 38; P.L. 2013, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 107, § 1.

41-9-2.
Financial disclosure by promoter.

By the first Monday in August prior to the general election at which the question of the establishment or extension of any gambling activity or facility is presented to the electorate, all persons and/or corporations promoting or having an interest of five percent (5%) or greater in the activity or facility shall file with the ethics commission the financial statement provided by the commission which shall conform with the requirements of §

36-14-16

. If the person and/or corporation acquire an interest of five percent (5%) or greater after the first Monday in August, that person and/or corporation shall file the financial statement within seven (7) days after acquiring the interest.

The duty to file the financial statement shall be a continuing duty and shall be required of any and all persons and/or corporations who or that have or will have an interest of five percent (5%) or greater in an activity and/or facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 419, § 1.

41-9-3.
Disclosure of regulated business interests.

Every person who is required to file a financial statement pursuant to this chapter and who has, or within the preceding three (3) years divests himself or herself of, five percent (5%) or greater equity interest in a business entity that is subject to regulation by this chapter, by a state or municipal agency, shall file with the ethics commission annually an affidavit:

Identifying himself or herself and stating the capacity in which he or she serves, or is about to serve, that occasions the filing of the affidavit;

Identifying the business entity (or each business entity) and all the principals thereof known to him or her;

Stating the nature of his or her interest in the business entity and that of all the principals thereof known to him or her;

Identifying all those persons and/or corporations known to him or her providing any financing for the business entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 419, § 1.

41-9-4.
Town and state election on establishment of facility.

Before a gambling facility shall be established in any town or city, the town council of the town or the city council of the city shall comply with the following procedure:

Upon receipt of a resolution from the town council of the town or the city council of the city, for a referendum to establish a gambling facility and/or activity, the general assembly shall determine, by passage of an act, whether to allow a referendum on the establishment of the gambling facility and/or activity.

Upon passage of an act to allow a referendum for the establishment of the gambling facility and/or activity, the town council of the town or the city council of the city shall pose, by adopting a resolution to be placed on the ballot at the next general election to be submitted to the qualified electors of the town or city and to the qualified electors of the state, the following question: “Shall a gambling facility and/or activity be established in the town (or city) of ?”

The question shall be submitted by the local board of canvassers to the electors of the town or city where the facility or activity is to be located, and the results of the election shall be certified to the secretary of state.

The question shall be submitted by the secretary of state to the qualified electors of the state at the same general election and the secretary of state shall certify the election results.

The affirmative vote of the subject town or city and the electors of the state shall be necessary for the approval of the question, and if consent be thus given, all rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the authority conferred upon the general assembly in

R.I. Const., Art. VI, Sec. XV

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 1990, ch. 508, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 38; P.L. 2016, ch. 5, § 12; P.L. 2016, ch. 6, § 12.

41-9-5.
Penalties.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a felony herein and punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and/or imprisonment for no longer than five (5) years for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 4.

41-9-6.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter shall specifically apply to any facility licensed pursuant to chapter 7 of this title prior to any casino gambling activity being licensed on the premises of the facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 110, § 1.